Washington statutes.
RCW 36.01.030

Powers—How exercised.

Its powers can only be exercised by the county commissioners, or by agents or officers acting under their authority or authority of law.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.01.030. Prior: Code 1881 s 2655; RRS s 3984.]